California statutes. Public Resources Code
 rental rates, based on geographic location, seasonality, and other relevant factors, that the conservancy will consider for purposes of identifying existing lower cost accommodations as well as potential future projects for program support. Any analysis developed pursuant to this paragraph shall not be interpreted to conflict with any rights and responsibilities of the Department of Parks and Recreation to establish rental rates or fees for accommodations within its jurisdiction.

(3) Data and analysis regarding the existing supply of and need for lower cost coastal accommodations within the program area, anticipated costs of new project development, and
 the supply of lower cost accommodations relative to population within 150 miles of the California coast.

(4) Criteria for prioritizing investment of program funds in lower cost accommodation projects, such as any applicable legal requirements that may apply to those funds, geography, the vulnerability of potential projects to sea level rise or coastal hazards, existing disparities in park or coastal access, availability of public agency or nonprofit partners, adequacy of existing infrastructure and services, and financial feasibility.

(5) A description of needed and anticipated measures to ensure that accommodation projects that may be supported by the program will be consistent with the purposes described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 31412.

(6) A list of appropriate public and private funding sources and potential financing mechanisms to support development and operation of lower cost accommodation projects.

(b) (1) The conservancy shall update the assessment not less than every five years, and maintain a current list of potential lower cost accommodation projects that may be implemented, subject to available funding.

(2) Each five-year update of the assessment shall include an evaluation of the conservancy’s implementation of the program over the preceding five years, and shall describe any recommended changes that may be needed to improve the program’s effectiveness.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 838, Sec. 3.   (AB 250)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

31414.

(a) The conservancy may develop and implement a pilot program for the purposes of identifying and testing measures that support development, improvement, maintenance, and operation of lower cost accommodations by nonprofit or for-profit private entities. The conservancy shall establish criteria for selection of projects that are eligible to receive assistance under the pilot program.

(b) In carrying out a pilot program, the conservancy may do all of the following:

(1) Purchase existing lower cost accommodations from willing sellers and operate those accommodations through leases or operating agreements
 with qualified regional or local park agencies, concessionaires, or nonprofit organizations.

(2) Purchase existing accommodations from willing sellers and resell them to willing buyers, including private entities.

(3) Provide loans, grants, or other financial assistance to private entities for purposes of acquiring or improving accommodations.

(c) (1) Any project or transaction undertaken pursuant to this section shall be subject to terms and conditions prescribed by the conservancy to ensure that the project or transaction advances the purposes of the program, is based upon the economic soundness of the project itself, and provides a reasonable expectation that all financial obligations of the project can be
 met by participating parties.

(2) Any sale of real property to a private entity pursuant to this section shall be subject to deed restrictions or other legally enforceable instruments that require the property to be used for the provision of lower cost coastal accommodations for at least 30 years following the date of sale.

(3) Any purchase of property by the conservancy pursuant to this chapter shall not be subject to the Property Acquisition Law (Part 11 (commencing with Section 15850) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(d) For purposes of this section, accommodations may include, but are not limited to, campgrounds, cabins, hostels, limited stay recreational vehicle parks, motels, and
 hotels, but shall not include private residences.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 838, Sec. 3.   (AB 250)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 22. CALIFORNIA URBAN WATERFRONT AREA RESTORATION FINANCING AUTHORITY ACT [32000. - 32208.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [32000. - 32028.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [32000. - 32003.]

32000.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the California Urban Waterfront Area Restoration Financing Authority Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32001.

The Legislature finds and declares that it is essential that the state, in cooperation with local governments, use all practical means and measures to restore, revitalize, and develop, in an economically and environmentally sound manner, the coastal and inland urban waterfront areas of the state.

The Legislature further finds that existing conditions in some of the state’s coastal urban waterfront areas prevent the attainment of one or more of the basic goals of the state set forth in Section 30001.5 for the coastal zone, and that existing sources of funding are not adequate to restore these areas in accordance with those goals.

The Legislature further finds that properly planned development of coastal and inland urban waterfronts with public recreation facilities, shoreline access facilities, visitor-serving commercial facilities, or coastal-dependent facilities, or with public works necessary for the implementation or preservation of an urban waterfront project, will promote attainment of the basic goals of the state for the coastal zone and will stimulate economic development and promote employment in coastal and inland urban waterfront areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32002.

As to urban waterfront areas in the coastal zone, the purpose of this division is to carry out and make effective Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 31300) of Division 21 and, to that end, provide an economically feasible method of financing urban waterfront restoration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32003.

This division is necessary for the welfare of the state and its inhabitants and shall be liberally construed to implement its purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [32020. - 32028.]

32020.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the interpretation of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32021.

“Authority” means the California Urban Waterfront Area Restoration Financing Authority established pursuant to Section 32050, and any board, commission, department, or officer succeeding to the functions thereof or to whom the powers conferred upon the authority by this division shall be given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32022.

“Bonds” means bonds, notes, bond anticipation notes, commercial paper, and any other evidences of indebtedness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32023.

“Coastal zone” means that area of the state defined in subdivision (a) of Section 31006, except that it includes lands in Contra Costa County from the Richmond-San Rafael Bridge north and east to the termination of the jurisdiction of the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, as described in Section 66610 of the Government Code, as well as any adjacent uplands, managed wetlands, marshes, and diked lands that significantly affect the environmental quality of the bay, or that are directly related to the public use and enjoyment of the San Francisco Bay.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1186, Sec. 2.   Effective September 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

32024.

“Conservancy” means the State Coastal Conservancy established pursuant to Section 31100.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32025.

“Cost,” as applied to a project, or portion thereof, financed under this division, means all, or any part of, the costs of construction and acquisition of all lands, structures, real or personal property, rights, rights-of-way, franchises, easements, and interests acquired or used for a project, the cost of demolition or removal of any buildings or structures on land so acquired, including the cost of acquiring any lands on which buildings or structures may be removed, the cost of all machinery and equipment, financing charges, interest prior to, during, and for a period after completion of the construction, as determined by the authority, provisions for working capital, reserves for principal and interest, and for extensions, enlargements, additions, replacements, renovations, and improvements, the cost of architectural, engineering, financial, and legal services, plans, specifications, estimates, administrative expenses, and other expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility of constructing any project, or incident to the construction or acquisition or financing of any project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32025.5.

“Metropolitan statistical area” means any area so defined by the federal Office of Management and Budget.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32026.

“Participating party” means any public or private entity, profit or nonprofit, including, but not limited to, any municipality, county, district, joint powers agency, person, company, corporation, partnership, firm, trust, or foundation, engaged in a project within the State of California, which obtains financing pursuant to the terms of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32027.

“Project” means an urban waterfront restoration activity located wholly or partly within the coastal zone for which a plan of urban waterfront restoration has been approved pursuant to Section 32059 and an urban waterfront restoration activity located within the territory of the Sacramento-Yolo Port District, the Stockton Port District, or on a river, lake, or reservoir located within a metropolitan statistical area for which a plan of urban waterfront restoration has been approved pursuant to Section 32059.5. Project includes, but is not limited to, lands, buildings, or roads, and improvements thereto, work, rehabilitation, structure, or property, real or personal, located wholly or partly within the coastal zone or within the territory of the Sacramento-Yolo Port District, the Stockton Port District, or on a river, lake, or reservoir located within a metropolitan statistical area, providing or designed to provide visitor serving commercial facilities, transient visitor accommodations, coastal or inland waterfront dependent industry, public utility systems, mass transit facilities, and public recreation and shoreline access facilities, including, but not limited to, parks, stairways, piers, and wharves, boat berthing facilities, parking facilities, visitor service centers, or interpretive centers, shoreline protection and erosion control facilities, and administrative facilities necessary for the operation of coastal dependent activities. Project does not include new permanent residential structures, office structures for nonmaritime purposes on lands subject to the public trust for commerce, navigation, and fisheries, noncoastal dependent industrial facilities, or other noncoastal related uses, or industrial facilities or other uses that are unrelated to an inland waterfront. A project may include office structures on lands not subject to the public trust for commerce, navigation, and fisheries, or office structures for maritime purposes on lands subject to the public trust for commerce, navigation, and fisheries, if the State Coastal Conservancy finds that the project physically includes all of the elements specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 32059.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 740, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32028.

“Revenue” means all rents, receipts, purchase payments, loan repayments, proceeds of bonds, and all other income or receipts derived by the authority from the sale, lease, or other disposition of projects, or the making of loans to finance projects, and any income derived from the investment of any money in any fund or account of the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Organization of the Authority: General Powers and Duties [32050. - 32059.5.]

32050.

(a) There is in state government the California Urban Waterfront Area Restoration Financing Authority. The authority constitutes a public instrumentality and a political subdivision of the state, and the exercise by the authority of powers conferred by this division is the performance of an essential public function.

(b) The authority shall consist of five members, the Director of Finance, the Controller, the Treasurer, the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, and the executive director of the conservancy. The Treasurer shall serve as chair of the authority.

(c) Each of the members of the authority may select a
 designee from the member’s agency to act for the member and represent the member at all meetings of the authority.

(d) The first meeting of the authority shall be convened by the Treasurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 213, Sec. 21.   (AB 2768)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

32051.

All members shall serve thereon without compensation as members of the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32052.

This division shall be administered by the authority which shall have, and is hereby vested with, all powers reasonably necessary to carry out its powers and responsibilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32053.

The authority shall maintain an office in the City of Sacramento.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32054.

The chair shall appoint an executive director who shall not be a member of the authority and who shall serve at the pleasure of the authority and shall employ the staff of the conservancy and other necessary persons to enable the authority to properly perform the duties imposed upon it by this division. The executive director shall receive compensation as fixed by the authority. The authority may delegate to the executive director the power to enter contracts on behalf of the authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 213, Sec. 22.   (AB 2768)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

32055.

The authority may, in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, adopt the necessary rules and regulations to carry out this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 665, Sec. 3.   Effective August 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

32056.

(a) The Attorney General shall be the legal counsel for the authority, but, upon approval of the Attorney General, which approval shall not be unreasonably withheld, the authority may employ legal counsel as, in its judgment, is necessary or advisable to enable it to carry out the duties and functions imposed on it by this division, including employment of bond counsel as deemed advisable in connection with the issuance and sale of bonds.

(b) The Director of Finance shall be the treasurer of the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32057.

Subject to the conditions, restrictions, and limitations of Section 32059, the authority shall have the power to do all the following:

(a) Adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business.

(b) Adopt an official seal.

(c) Sue and be sued in its own name.

(d) Issue bonds, including, at the option of the authority, bonds bearing interest that is taxable for the purpose of federal income taxation, to pay the cost of any project.

(e) Engage the services of private consultants to render professional and technical assistance and advice in carrying out the purposes of this division.

(f) Employ and fix compensation of bond counsel, project expediters, financial consultants, and other advisors as may be necessary, in its judgment, in connection with the issuance and sale of any bonds or other obligations of the authority.

(g) Contract for engineering, architectural, accounting, or other services of appropriate state agencies as may be necessary, in its judgment, for the successful development of the project.

(h) Pay the reasonable costs of consulting engineers, architects, accountants, and construction, land use, recreation, and environmental experts employed by any participating party if, in its judgment, those services are necessary for the successful development of the project.

(i) Take title to, and sell by installment sale or otherwise, lands, structures, property, real or personal, rights, rights-of-way, franchises, easements, and other interests in lands which are located within the state as it may deem necessary or convenient for the financing of a project, upon terms and conditions as considered by it to be reasonable.

(j) Receive and accept from any source, loans, contributions, or grants for, or in aid of, the construction, financing, or refinancing of a project, or any portion thereof, in either money, property, labor, or other things of value.

(k) Make secured or unsecured loans to any participating party in connection with the financing of a project in accordance with an agreement between the authority and the participating party, except that no loan shall exceed the total cost of the project as determined by the participating party and approved by the authority.

(l) Make secured or unsecured loans to any participating party in accordance with an agreement between the authority and the participating party to refinance indebtedness incurred by the participating party in connection with projects undertaken and completed.

(m) Mortgage all or any portion of its interest in a project and the property on which any project is located, whether owned or thereafter acquired, including the granting of a security interest in any property, tangible or intangible, and to assign or pledge all or any portion of its interests in mortgages, deeds of trust, indentures of mortgage or trust or similar instruments, notes, and security interests in property, tangible or intangible, of participating parties to which the authority has made loans, and the revenues therefrom, including payment or income from any interest owned or held by the authority, for the benefit of the holders of bonds issued to finance the project.

(n) Lease to a participating party the project being financed, upon terms and conditions that the authority deems proper, and to charge and collect rents therefor, and to terminate any lease upon the failure of the lessee to comply with any of the obligations thereof, and to include in any lease, if desired, provisions that the lessee shall have options to renew the lease for a period or periods, and at rents as determined by the authority, to purchase any or all of the project, or that, upon payment of all of the indebtedness incurred by the authority for the financing of the project, the authority may convey any or all of the project to the lessee or lessees.

(o) Charge and equitably apportion among participating parties its administrative costs and expenses incurred in the exercise of the powers and duties conferred by this division.

(p) Obtain, or aid in obtaining, from any department or agency of the United States or of the State of California, or any private company, any insurance or guarantee as to, or for, the payment or repayment of interest or principal, or both, or any part thereof, on any loan, lease, or obligation or any instrument evidencing or securing the same, made or entered into pursuant to this division; and, notwithstanding any other provision of this division, to enter into any agreement, contract, or any other instrument with respect to any insurance or guarantee, to accept payment in the manner and form as provided therein in the event of default by a participating party, and to assign any insurance or guarantee as security for the authority’s bonds.

(q) Enter into any and all agreements or contracts, execute any and all instruments, and do and perform any and all acts or things necessary, convenient, or desirable for the purposes of the authority or to carry out any power expressly given in this division.

(r) Invest any moneys held in reserve or sinking funds, or any moneys not required for immediate use or disbursement, at the discretion of the authority, in obligations that are authorized by law for the investment of trust funds in the custody of the Treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32058.

The authority shall establish criteria for the selection of projects to receive financial assistance from the authority. The project selection criteria shall be based upon the economic soundness of the project itself and a reasonable expectation that all financial obligations of the project can be met by participating parties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 665, Sec. 4.   Effective August 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

32059.

(a) No project located wholly or partially within the coastal zone shall be eligible for approval unless it has been approved by the conservancy and is located in a part of the coastal zone for which a plan for urban waterfront restoration has been approved by the conservancy pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 31300) of Division 21.

(b) The conservancy shall approve a plan for the purposes of utilizing the financing provisions of this division only if it finds both of the following:

(1) Existing conditions prevent the attainment of one or more of the basic goals of the state for the coastal zone, as identified in Section 30001.5.

(2) The proposed plan provides for public access or public recreation benefits, environmental enhancement, and has a potential for employment development and economic stimulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32059.5.

(a) No project located within the territory of the Sacramento-Yolo Port District, the Stockton Port District, or on a river, lake, or reservoir within a metropolitan statistical area shall be eligible for approval unless it has been approved by the conservancy and a plan for urban waterfront restoration has been approved by the conservancy.

(b) The conservancy shall approve a plan for the purposes of utilizing the financing provisions of this division for projects specified in subdivision (a) only if it finds that the proposed plan provides for public access or public recreational benefits, provides for environmental enhancement, and has a potential for employment development and economic stimulation.

(c) Fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) shall be reserved for projects on a river, lake, or reservoir in a metropolitan statistical area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Funds: Security for Payment of Bonds: Accounts: Deposits: Investments: Interest and Other Increments [32060. - 32066.]

32060.

(a) The California Urban Waterfront Area Restoration Financing Authority Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the authority for carrying out the purposes of this division.

The authority may pledge any or all of the moneys in the fund as security for payment of the principal of, and interest on, any particular issuance of bonds issued pursuant to this division, and, for that purpose, or as necessary or convenient to the accomplishment of any other purpose of the authority, may divide the fund into separate accounts. All moneys accruing to the authority pursuant to this division from any source shall be deposited in the fund.

(b) Subject to priorities that may be created by the pledge of particular moneys in the fund to secure any issuance of bonds of the authority, and subject further to reasonable costs that may be incurred by the authority in administering the program authorized by this division, all moneys in the fund derived from any source shall be held in trust for the security and payment of bonds of the authority and shall not be used or pledged for any other purpose so long as the bonds are outstanding and unpaid. However, nothing in this section shall limit the power of the authority to make loans with the proceeds of bonds in accordance with the terms of the resolution authorizing the bonds.

(c) Pursuant to any agreements with the holders of particular bonds pledging any particular assets, revenues, or moneys, the authority may create separate accounts in the fund to manage assets, revenues, or moneys in the manner set forth in the agreements.

(d) The authority may, from time to time, direct the Treasurer to invest moneys in the fund which are not required for its current needs, including proceeds from the sale of any bonds, in such eligible securities specified in Section 16430 of the Government Code as the authority shall designate. The authority may direct the Treasurer to deposit moneys in interest-bearing accounts in state or national banks or other financial institutions having principal offices in this state. The authority may alternatively require the transfer of moneys in the fund to the Surplus Money Investment Fund for investment pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 16470) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Notwithstanding Section 16305.7 of the Government Code, all interest or other increment resulting from the investment or deposit of moneys from the fund shall be deposited in the fund. Moneys in the fund shall not be subject to transfer to any other funds pursuant to any provision of Part 2 (commencing with Section 16300) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, except to the Surplus Money Investment Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32061.

All expenses incurred in carrying out this division shall be payable solely from funds provided under the authority of this division, and no liability or obligation shall be imposed upon the State of California and, except as provided in Section 32116, none shall be incurred by the authority beyond the extent to which money shall have been provided under this division. Under no circumstance shall the authority create any debt, liability, or obligation on the part of the State of California payable from any source other than the moneys provided under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32061.5.

The activities of the conservancy in carrying out its responsibilities under this division shall be deemed to be consistent with and in furtherance of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 31300) of Division 21.

The conservancy may pay for its support costs associated with this division from any funding source appropriated and available to it which may be used to fund its support activities under that Chapter 7. However, the conservancy shall keep records of its support expenditures associated with projects which may receive any or all of their funding pursuant to this division and, if the authority ultimately issues bonds for any such project, the conservancy shall seek repayment of its support costs with respect to that project from the authority. The authority shall reimburse the conservancy for its necessary and reasonable support costs in developing projects which are funded pursuant to this division.

Nothing in this section precludes the authority from reimbursing the conservancy for additional costs associated with its responsibilities under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 740, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

32062.

All projects financed by the authority shall be constructed or completed subject to the rules and regulations of the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32063.

When the principal of, and interest on, bonds of the authority issued to finance the cost of a particular project for a participating party, including any refunding bonds issued to refund and refinance all or any part of the bonds, have been fully paid and retired, or when adequate provisions have been made for the payment and retirement of the bonds, and all other conditions of any resolution, lease, indenture, mortgage or deed of trust, security interest, or any other instrument or instruments authorizing and securing the bonds have been satisfied, and any lien created has been released in accordance with the provisions thereof, the authority is authorized, upon terms and conditions it may prescribe, to do all things and execute releases, release deeds, reassignments, deeds, and conveyances necessary or required to convey or release its right, title, and interest in the project financed and any other instruments pledged or transferred to secure bonds to the participating party.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32064.

(a) The authority, or its executive director if authorized by resolution of the authority, shall take official action towards the issuance of bonds with respect to any participating party at the next meeting of the authority occurring more than 30 days following the receipt of a completed application. Official action towards the issuance of bonds may reserve the right of the authority to further review an application for financing and consider terms thereof prior to the issuance of bonds therefor.

(b) The authority shall take final action to approve or disapprove the issuance of bonds to lend financial assistance to participating parties within 60 days from the receipt by the authority of a request from a participating party for action. Any request by a participating party shall be accompanied by evidence of fulfillment of any and all conditions to the issuance of the bonds imposed at the time the first action towards the issuance was taken by the authority and copies of forms of all principal legal documents to be approved by the authority.

(c) The authority may give final approval for the issuance of the bonds upon terms it deems necessary or desirable.

(d) Any action under this section shall be at the sole discretion of the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32065.

The authority, not later than March 31 of each year, shall submit to the Legislature a report of its activities for the preceding calendar year ending December 31. The report shall include a listing of applications received, a listing of applications accepted for financing, a specification of bonds sold, interest rates thereon, and whether bond sales were pursuant to public bid or were negotiated, a specification of the amount of bonds authorized but currently unsold, a projection of the authority’s needs and requirements for the coming year, and a report of revenues and expenditures for the preceding fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 665, Sec. 5.   Effective August 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

32066.

The Treasurer is the elected representative of the state to approve the issuance of bonds issued by or on behalf of the state pursuant to this chapter to the extent this approval is required by federal tax law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Bonds and Notes [32100. - 32154.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [32100. - 32116.]

32100.

The total amount of bonds which may be outstanding at any one time under this division shall not exceed six hundred fifty million dollars ($650,000,000). Bonds for which moneys or securities in amounts necessary to pay or redeem the principal, interest, and any redemption premium thereon have been deposited in trust shall not be deemed outstanding for purposes of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32101.

The Legislature may, by statute, authorize the authority to issue bonds in excess of the amount specified in Section 32100.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32102.

(a) The authority is authorized from time to time to issue its negotiable bonds to provide funds to achieve its purposes.

(b) Bonds may be authorized to finance a single project for a single participating party, a series of projects for a single participating party, a single project for several participating parties, or several projects for several participating parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32103.

Except as otherwise expressly provided by the authority, every issue of its bonds shall be general obligations of the authority payable from any revenues or moneys of the authority available therefor and not otherwise pledged, including the proceeds of additional bonds, subject only to any agreements with the holders of particular bonds, notes, or other obligations pledging any particular revenues or moneys and subject to any agreements with holders of particular bonds pledging any particular revenues. Notwithstanding that the bonds may be payable from a special fund, they shall be deemed to be negotiable instruments for all purposes, subject only to the bond registration provisions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 597.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

32104.

Subject to the limitations in Sections 32100 and 32101, the bonds may be issued as serial bonds or as term bonds, or the authority may, in its discretion, issue bonds of both types. The bonds shall be authorized by resolution of the authority and shall bear the date or dates, mature at the time or times, not exceeding 50 years from their respective dates, bear interest at the rate or rates, be payable at the time or times, be in the denominations, be in the form, either coupon or registered, carry the registration privileges, be executed in the manner, be payable in lawful money of the United States of America at the place or places, and be subject to the terms of redemption, as the resolution or resolutions provide.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32105.

The bonds or notes shall be sold by the Treasurer within 60 days after receipt of a certified copy of the authority’s resolution authorizing the sale of the bonds, except that the authority may, at its discretion, adopt a resolution extending the 60-day period. The sale may be a public or private sale, and for such price or prices and on such terms and conditions, as the authority determines, after giving due consideration to the recommendations of any participating party to be assisted from the proceeds of the bonds. Pending preparation of the definitive bonds, the Treasurer may issue interim receipts, certificates, or temporary bonds which shall be exchanged for definitive bonds. The Treasurer may sell any bonds at a price below the par value if the discount on any bonds sold does not exceed 6 percent of the par value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32106.

Any resolution or resolutions authorizing any bonds or any issue of bonds may contain the following provisions, which shall be a part of the contract with the holders of the bonds to be authorized:

(a) Pledging the full faith and credit of the authority, or pledging all or any part of the revenues of any urban waterfront restoration project or any revenue-producing contract or contracts made by the authority with any individual, partnership, corporation, or association or other body, public or private, or other moneys of the authority, to secure the payment of the bonds or of any particular issue of bonds, subject to those agreements with bondholders as may then exist.

(b) The rentals, fees, purchase payments, loan repayments, and other charges to be charged, and the amounts to be raised in each year thereby, and the use and disposition of the revenues.

(c) The setting aside of reserves or sinking funds, and the regulation and disposition thereof.

(d) Limitations on the right of the authority or its agent to restrict and regulate the use of the project or projects to be financed out of the proceeds of the bonds or any particular issue of bonds.

(e) Limitations on the purpose to which the proceeds of sale of any issue of bonds then or thereafter to be issued may be applied, and pledging the proceeds to secure the payment of the bonds or any issue of the bonds.

(f) Limitations on the issuance of additional bonds, the terms upon which additional bonds may be issued and secured and the refunding of outstanding bonds. 

(g) The procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with bondholders may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds and the holders thereof that are required to give consent thereto, and the manner in which the consent may be given.

(h) Limitations on expenditures for operating, administrative, or other expenses of the authority.

(i) Defining the acts or omissions to act which constitute a default in the duties of the authority to holders of its obligations, and providing the rights and remedies of the holders in the event of a default.

(j) The mortgaging of any project and the site thereof for the purpose of securing the bondholders.

(k) The mortgaging of land, improvements, or other assets owned by a participating party for the purpose of securing the bondholders.

(l) Procedures for the selection of projects to be financed with the proceeds of the bonds authorized by the resolution, if the bonds are to be sold in advance of the designation of the projects and the participating parties to receive the financing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32107.

Neither the members of the authority nor any person executing the bonds or notes shall be liable personally on the bonds or notes or be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance thereof.
